src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON N-keeli_01
:i     SG-NOM   ; ! keeli
:e SG-GEN   ; ! maon
 SG-PAR_tA  ; ! keeltä
:e SG-ILL_V   ; ! keelee
:e SG-INE   ; ! keelees
:e SG-ELA   ; ! maost
:e SG-ALL   ; ! maolle
:e SG-ADE   ; ! maool
:e SG-ABL   ; ! maolt
:e SG-TRA   ; ! maoks
:e SG-ESS_nnA   ; ! mattoon
:e SG-EXE   ; ! mattoon
:e SG-COM   ; ! maanka
! Plural
:e PL-NOM   ; ! keelet
 PL-GEN   ; ! keeliin
 PL-PAR_A   ; ! matoloja
 PL-ILL_V   ; ! keelii
 PL-INE   ; ! keeliis
 PL-ELA   ; ! matoloist
 PL-ALL   ; ! matoloille
 PL-ADE   ; ! matoloil
 PL-ABL   ; ! matoloilt
 PL-TRA   ; ! matoloiks
 PL-ESS_nnA   ; ! matoloin
 PL-EXE    #   ; ! matoloint
 PL-COM   ; ! mataloinka

LEXICON N-sammal
+N+Der/tOin:e%>%^WCnst A-kalatoin ; !
+N: N-sammal_01 ;

LEXICON N-sammal_01
     SG-NOM   ; ! sammal
:e SG-GEN   ; ! maon
 SG-PAR_tA  ; ! keeltä
:e%>%^LCns SG-ILL_V   ; ! mattoo
:e SG-INE   ; ! maooz
:e SG-ELA   ; ! maost
:e SG-ALL   ; ! maolle
:e SG-ADE   ; ! maool
:e SG-ABL   ; ! maolt
:e SG-TRA   ; ! maoks
:e SG-ESS_nnA   ; ! mattoon
:e SG-EXE   ; ! mattoon
:e SG-COM   ; ! maanka
! Plural
:e PL-NOM   ; ! keelet
 PL-GEN   ; ! keeliin
 PL-PAR_A   ; ! matoloja
 PL-ILL_V   ; ! keelii
 PL-INE   ; ! keeliis
 PL-ELA   ; ! matoloist
 PL-ALL   ; ! matoloille
 PL-ADE   ; ! matoloil
 PL-ABL   ; ! matoloilt
 PL-TRA   ; ! matoloiks
 PL-ESS_nnA   ; ! matoloin
 PL-EXE    #   ; ! matoloint
 PL-COM   ; ! mataloinka

! (XIV)
LEXICON N-XIV
#;

! (XV)
LEXICON N-XV
#;

! (XVI)
LEXICON N-XVI
#;

! (XVII)
LEXICON N-XVII
#;

! (XVIII)
LEXICON N-XVIII
#;

! (XIX)
LEXICON N-XIX
#;

! (XX) oikehus
LEXICON N-oikehus
+N+Der/tOin:te%>%^WCnst A-kalatoin ; !
+N: N-oikehus_01 ;

LEXICON N-oikehus_01
+Sg+Nom:s           K  ;
+Sg+Gen:e%>n      K  ;
+Sg+Acc:e%>n      K  ;
+Sg+Par:t%>tAÄ1	#   ; ! kärpäistä
:e SG-ILL_sse   ; ! oikehuesse
+Sg+Ine:e%>%^WCnss    #   ; ! maooz
+Sg+Ela:e%>%^WCnsst    #   ; ! maost
+Sg+All:e%>%^WCnslle    #   ; ! maolle
+Sg+Ade:e%>%^WCnsl    #   ; ! maool
+Sg+Abl:e%>%^WCnslt    #   ; ! maolt
+Sg+Tra:e%>%^WCnsks    #   ; ! oikehueks
+Sg+Ess:e%>nnAÄ1    #   ; ! oikehuenna
+Sg+Exe:e%>nt			    K	; ! oikehuent
+Sg+Com:e%>%^WCnsnkAÄ1    #   ; ! maanka
! Plural
:e PL-NOM  ; ! oikehuet
:ks Oblique-Plural_V ;
:ks PL-PAR_A ;


! kevät (XX-a)
! venät:venä
LEXICON N-venät
+N: N-venät_01 ;

LEXICON N-venät_01
 N-venät_01-Sg ;
:%^SyllBr Oblique-Plural ;
:%^SyllBr PL-PAR_tA ;

LEXICON N-venät_01-Sg
:%^SyllBre%^StretchSyll2 SG-GEN ;
:%^SyllBre%^StretchSyll2 PL-NOM ;
:t SG-NOM ;
:t SG-PAR_tA ;
:e SG-ILL_sse ;
:e SG-INE ;
:ee SG-INE ;
:e SG-ELA ;
:e SG-ALL ;
:e SG-ADE ;
:ee SG-ADE ;
:e SG-ABL ;
:e SG-TRA ;
:%^SyllBre%^StretchSyll2 SG-TRA ;
:e SG-ESS_nnA ;
:e SG-EXE ;

! päivyt:päivy
LEXICON N-päivyt
+N: N-päivyt_01 ;

LEXICON N-päivyt_01
 N-venät_01-Sg ;
:e Oblique-Plural_sse ;
:e PL-PAR_tA ;


! (XXI)
LEXICON N-XXI
#;

LEXICON Cases
!+N+Sg+Nom:0     #   ;
!+N+Pl+Nom:i     #   ;
+N+Sg+Ine:%>%^WCnsz%^ShVws    #   ; ! opokka : opokaaz
+N+Sg+Ela:%>%^WCnsst    #   ; ! jalka : jalast
+N+Sg+All:%>%^WCnsle    #   ; ! katto : katolle
+N+Sg+Ade:%>%^WCnsl%^ShVws    #   ; ! katto : katool
+N+Sg+Abl:%>%^WCnslt    #   ; ! katto : katolt
+N+Sg+Tra:%>%^WCnsks    #   ; ! musta : musaks
+N+Sg+Ess:%>n%^ShVws    #   ; ! sotilaz : sotilahhaan, 

!!!!
! Fed by +N+Pl, +N+Prop+Pl, +A+Pl
LEXICON lOi-Pl
:%>lOÖ1 Oblique-Plural_hV ;
:lOÖ1 PL-PAR_A ;
:lOÖ1 PL-PAR_tA ;

LEXICON Oblique-Plural_blank
 PL-ILL_blank ;
 Oblique-Plural ;

LEXICON Oblique-Plural_sse
 PL-ILL_sse ;
 Oblique-Plural ;

LEXICON Oblique-Plural_V
 PL-ILL_V ;
 Oblique-Plural ;

LEXICON Oblique-Plural_hV
 PL-ILL_hV ;
 Oblique-Plural ;

LEXICON Oblique-Plural
      PL-GEN		;
      PL-INE		;
      PL-ELA		;
      PL-ALL		;
      PL-ADE		;
      PL-ABL		;
      PL-TRA		;
      PL-ESS_Vn		;
      PL-ESS_nnA		;
      PL-EXE		;
      PL-COM		;
      PL-INS	;
      PL-PRL		;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! PLURAL TAGS !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PL-ABE
+Pl+Abe@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ABE@:%>i%>%^WCnstAÄ1@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ABE@    K_Num  ;

LEXICON PL-ABL
+Pl+Abl@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ABL@:%>i%>%^WCnslt@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ABL@    K_Num  ;
+Pl+Abl+PxSg3@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ABL@:%>i%>%^WCnsltAÄ1AÄ1@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ABL@  K_Num  ;

LEXICON PL-ADE
+Pl+Ade@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ADE@:%>i%>%^WCnsV3l@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ADE@    K_Num  ;
+Pl+Ade@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ADE@:%>i%>%^WCnsl@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ADE@    K_Num  ;
+Pl+Ade+PxSg3@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ADE@:%>i%>%^WCnsllAÄ1AÄ1@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ADE@  K_Num  ;

LEXICON PL-ALL
+Pl+All@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ALL@:%>i%>%^WCnslle@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ALL@    K_Num  ; 
+Pl+All+PxSg3@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ALL@:%>i%>%^WCnsllee@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ALL@  K_Num  ; 

LEXICON PL-COM
+Dial/Lauk+Pl+Com@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.COM@:%>i%>%^WCnsnkAÄ1@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.COM@    K_Num ;

LEXICON PL-ELA
+Pl+Ela@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ELA@:%>i%>%^WCnsst@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ELA@    K_Num ;
+Pl+Ela+PxSg3@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ELA@:%>i%>%^WCnsstAÄ1AÄ1@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ELA@    K_Num ;

LEXICON PL-ESS_Vn
+Dial/Soik+Pl+Ess@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ESS@:%>%^LCns%>i%>V3n@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ESS@	 K_Num  ;

LEXICON PL-ESS_nnA
+Dial/Lauk+Pl+Ess@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ESS@:%>i%>nnAÄ1@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ESS@    K_Num  ;

LEXICON PL-EXE
+Pl+Exe@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.EXE@:%>i%>nt@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.EXE@    K_Num  ;

LEXICON PL-GEN
+Pl+Gen@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.GEN@:%>%^LCns%>i%>V3n@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.GEN@    K_Num  ;

LEXICON PL-ILL_blank
+Pl+Ill@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ILL@:%>%^LCns%>i%>@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ILL@    K_Num   ;

LEXICON PL-ILL_sse
+Pl+Ill@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ILL@:%>i%>sse@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ILL@    K_Num   ;

LEXICON PL-ILL_V
+Pl+Ill@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ILL@:%>%^LCns%>i%>V1@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ILL@    K_Num   ;

LEXICON PL-ILL_hV
+Pl+Ill@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ILL@:%>i%>he@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ILL@    K_Num   ;

LEXICON PL-INE
+Pl+Ine@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.INE@:%>i%>%^WCnsV3s@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.INE@    K_Num  ;
+Pl+Ine@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.INE@:%>i%>%^WCnss@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.INE@    K_Num  ;
+Pl+Ine+PxSg3@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.INE@:%>i%>%^WCnsssAÄ1AÄ1@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.INE@    K_Num  ;

! instruktiva
! only with Px...
LEXICON PL-INS
+Pl+Instr+PxSg3@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.INS@:%>i%>nee@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.INS@    #   ; ! lehminee

LEXICON PL-NOM
+Pl+Nom@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.NOM@:%>%^WCnst@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.NOM@   K_Num  ;
+Pl+Acc@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ACC@:%>%^WCnst@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ACC@   K_Num  ;

LEXICON PL-PAR_A
+Pl+Par@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.PAR@:%>i%>AÄ1@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.PAR@      K_Num  ;

! kana:kano
LEXICON PL-PAR_A-LCns
+Pl+Par@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.PAR@:%>%^LCns%>i%>AÄ1@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.PAR@      K_Num  ;


LEXICON PL-PAR_tA
+Pl+Par@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.PAR@:%>i%>tAÄ1@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.PAR@      K_Num  ;
+Pl+Par+PxSg3@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.PAR@:%>i%>tAÄ1AÄ1@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.PAR@      K_Num  ;

LEXICON PL-PRL
+Pl+Prl@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.PRL@:%>i%>%^WCnstse@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.PRL@    #   ; ! rannoitse

LEXICON PL-TRA
+Pl+Tra@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.TRA@:%>i%>%^WCnsks@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.TRA@   K_Num  ;
+Pl+Tra+PxSg2@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.TRA@:%>i%>%^WCnsksees@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.TRA@   K_Num  ;
+Pl+Tra+PxSg3@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.TRA@:%>i%>%^WCnsksee@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.TRA@   K_Num  ;

LEXICON SG-ABE
+Sg+Abe@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.ABE@:%>%^WCnstAÄ1@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.ABE@    K_Num  ;

LEXICON SG-ABL
+Sg+Abl@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.ABL@:%>%^WCnslt@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.ABL@    K_Num  ;
+Sg+Abl+PxSg3@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.ABL@:%>%^WCnsltAÄ1AÄ1@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.ABL@  K_Num  ;
