src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON nouns
venät:venä N-venät  "" ;
kevät:kevä N-venät  "" ;
päivyt:päivy N-päivyt  "" ;
meryt:mery N-päivyt  "" ;
oikehus:oikehu N-oikehus  "" ;
levehys:levehy N-oikehus  "" ;
vähhyys:vähhyy N-oikehus  "" ;
yhtehys:yhtehy N-oikehus  "" ;
talohus:talohu N-oikehus  "" ;
köyhys:köyhy N-oikehus  "" ;
noorus:nooru N-oikehus  "" ;
pittuus:pittuu N-oikehus  "" ;
lapsus:lapsu N-oikehus  "" ;
nooruus:nooruu N-oikehus  "" ;
poolipittuus:pooli#pittuu N-oikehus  "" ;
portuus:portuu N-oikehus  "" ;
tuttahus:tuttahu N-oikehus  "" ;
vahvus:vahvu N-oikehus  "" ;
voimakkuus:voimakkuu N-oikehus  "" ;
jurmus:jurmu N-oikehus  "" ;
kuivus:kuivu N-oikehus  "" ;
korkehus:korkehu N-oikehus  "" ;
hyvvyys:hyvvyy N-oikehus  "" ;
lyhhyys:lyhhyy N-oikehus  "" ;
rääyys:rääyy N-oikehus  "" ;
syvvyys:syvvyy N-oikehus  "" ;
syvvyys:syvyy N-oikehus  "" ;
vanhus:vanhu N-oikehus  "" ;
yhtehys:yhtehy N-oikehus  "" ;
rankkuus:rankkuu N-oikehus  "" ;
sammal:sammal N-sammal  "" ;
paimen:paimen N-sammal  "" ;
